Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2586.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriations; fiscal years 2026-2027, 2027-2028 and 2028-2029; state department of corrections; holistic studio-based rehabilitative programming and interventions; report A. The sum of $1,000,000 is appropriated from the special services fund established by section 41-1604.03, Arizona Revised Statutes, in each of fiscal years 2026-2027, 2027-2028 and 2028-2029 to the state department of corrections to establish and implement holistic studio-based rehabilitative programming and interventions. B. On or before June 30, 2030, the state department of corrections shall submit a report to the governor, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives on the use of the monies appropriated in subsection A of this section and documented results, including data on reduction of self-harm, disciplinary reduction and recidivism, and shall provide a copy of this report to the secretary of state.